Illinois, session 104th, HB1859.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Community College Act is amended by 5adding Section 3-29.28 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 805/3-29.28 new)7    Sec. 3-29.28. Use of artificial intelligence in 8instruction. 9    (a) As used in this Section, "artificial intelligence" has 10the same meaning given to the term in Section 2-101 of the 11Illinois Human Rights Act.12    (b) Each board shall require the faculty member who 13teaches a course to be an individual who meets the 14qualifications set forth in 23 Ill. Adm. Code 1501.303(f) and 15any other applicable rules adopted by the State Board. A 16course may not, in lieu of a faculty member, use artificial 17intelligence as the sole source of instruction for students.18    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 19a faculty member from using artificial intelligence to augment 20course instruction.